Utah statutes.
38-11-202.   Payments to the fund.
The Residence Lien Recovery Fund shall be supported solely from:
(1)  initial and special assessments collected by the division from licensed
contractors registered as qualified beneficiaries in accordance with
Subsections 38-11-301(1) and (2) and Section 38-11-206;
(2)  initial and special assessments collected by the division from other
qualified beneficiaries registering with the division in accordance with
Subsection 38-11-301(3) and Section 38-11-206;
(3)  fees determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504 collected from
laborers under Subsection 38-11-204(7) when the laborers obtain a recovery
from the fund;
(4)  amounts collected by subrogation under Section 38-11-205 on behalf of the
fund following a payment from the fund;
(5)  application fees determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504
collected from:
(a)   qualified beneficiaries or laborers under Subsection 38-11-204(1)(b)
when qualified beneficiaries or laborers make a claim against the fund; or
(b)  owners or agents of the owners seeking to obtain a certificate of
compliance for the owner;
(6)  registration fees determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504
collected from other qualified beneficiaries registering with the department
in accordance with Subsection 38-11-301(3)(a)(iii);
(7)  reinstatement fees determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504
collected from registrants in accordance with Subsection 38-11-302(5)(b);
(8)  civil fines authorized under Subsection 38-11-205(2) collected by the
attorney general for failure to reimburse the fund; and
(9)  any interest earned by the fund.
